Utah statutes.
53A-1a-710.   Review by Legislative Auditor General.

The Legislative Auditor General shall conduct a review and issue a report on the Carson Smith Scholarship Program after the conclusion of the 2006-07 school year.



Enacted by Chapter 35, 2005 General Session

